Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2312
Normal working hours, defined.

Normal working hours shall mean the hours of 7 a.m. to 5 p.m. on a business day in each time zone in the state.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 12.